District of Columbia statutes.
22-1402

Recordation of deed, contract, or conveyance with intent to extort money.

Whoever having no title or color of title to the land affected shall maliciously cause to be recorded in the office of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia any deed, contract, or other instrument purporting to convey or to relate to any land in said District with intent to extort money or anything of value from any person owning such land, or having any interest therein, shall be fined not less than $1,000 and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both.

June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 535, ch. 1329, § 845a
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 106, 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 217, 60 DCR 2064
Extortion, see § 22-3251.
1981 Ed., § 22-1302.
1973 Ed., § 22-1302.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added “and not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01”.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 106 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 217 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.